test/src/morphology/V-viskama_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - viskama: # Verb '/(eng) to throw /(fin) heittää' - partial paradigm
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: viska
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: [viskat, viskadõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: viskas
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: viskamiq
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [viskatiq, viskadõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: viskasõq
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+Sc+ConNeg: [viska, viska-aiq, viskaq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg1: visada
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg2: [visatat, visatadõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3: visatas
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl1: visatamiq
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl2: [visatatiq, visatadõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3: visatasõq
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+Oc+ConNeg: [visada, visada-aiq, visadaq]
